Hawaii statutes.
[§481B-16] Protection of military; lending
practices. (a) The director of commerce and consumer affairs may
enforce title 10 United States Code section 987, (section 670 of the John
Warner National Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 2007, Public Law No.
109-364), and federal regulations promulgated thereunder, including but not
limited to title 32 Code of Federal Regulations part 232.

(b) The director of commerce and consumer
affairs may enter into an agreement with the United States Federal Trade
Commission to allow the director to access the Military Sentinel Network
maintained by the Federal Trade Commission for the purpose of enforcing
subsection (a). [L 2012, c 249, §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next